Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1361.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. PFC Travis C. Zimmerman Memorial Bridge.(a) Findings.--The General Assembly finds and declares as follows:(1) Travis Clyde Zimmerman was born October 26, 1986.(2) PFC Zimmerman was the son of Lloyd C. Zimmerman, Jr., and Gail (Clemens) Camperson.(3) He attended Boyertown Area High School graduating in 2005.(4) PFC Zimmerman enjoyed hunting, fishing, canoeing, swimming, golf, frisbee, wrestling and tennis.(5) He enlisted in the United States Army and was stationed at Fort Campbell with Bravo Company of the 101st Airborne, 2nd Battalion, 502nd Infantry Regiment, known as 12345678910111213141516171819 the Screaming Eagles.(6) PFC Zimmerman was further stationed at Camp Striker in South Baghdad, Iraq.(7) Travis Clyde Zimmerman was killed in action on April 22, 2006, in Iraq while serving his country.(8) He was posthumously promoted to Private First Class and awarded the Bronze Star and Purple Heart.(b) Designation.--The bridge, identified as Bridge Key 56130, carrying Pennsylvania Route 562 over Manatawny Creek in Amity Township, Berks County, is designated as the PFC Travis C. Zimmerman Memorial Bridge.(c) Signs.--The Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs displaying the name of the bridge to traffic in both directions on the bridge.Section 2. Effective date.This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1361PN1548 - 2 - 12345678910111213141516